Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4413.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws shall be amended in section 13 by adding after the word
“manslaughter” in the first sentence, the following language:-
“or manslaughter caused by reckless disregard of life while protesting or blocking
highway or roadway access”
of 1